Georgia, session 2025_26, SB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
is amended in Chapter 1, relating to general provisions, by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"43-1-37.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, after
January 1, 2026, no licensed healthcare professional authorized to perform dry needling in
this state shall perform dry needling unless such professional demonstrates to the
S. B. 169
- 1 -

LC 52 0748
satisfaction of the Georgia Composite Medical Board the successful completion of the
following:
(1) Coursework and training in the practice of dry needling totaling 1,365 hours, which
shall include:
(A) Instruction in medical theory, diagnosis, and treatment techniques specific to
acupuncture totaling 705 hours; and
(B) Clinical training in dry needling, including clinical observation and clinical
internship, totaling 660 hours;
(2) A nationally recognized clean needle technique course approved by the Georgia
Composite Medical Board; and
(3) A minimum of 500 dry needling treatments on at least 100 different patients during
a 12 month period under the direct supervision of a licensed healthcare professional who
has a minimum of four years of licensed clinical practice performing dry needling.
(b) The requirements provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to:
(1) A licensed acupuncturist or a licensed physician who has successfully completed
requirements to perform dry needling as established by the Georgia Composite Medical
Board; or
(2) A licensed physical therapist who, prior to January 1, 2026, successfully completed
requirements to perform dry needling as established by the State Board of Physical
Therapy.
(c) The prohibition in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not prevent either of the
following:
(1) A student from performing dry needling while enrolled in an acupuncture education
program and under the direct clinical supervision of a licensed acupuncturist; or
(2) An individual from performing dry needling while completing requirements provided
in subsection (a) of this Code section."
S. B. 169
- 2 -

LC 52 0748
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended in Code Section 43-33-18, relating to refusal to grant or restore
licenses, discipline of licensees, suspension, revocation, or restriction of licenses, and
immunity for violation reporters, by revising subparagraph (a)(2)(E) as follows:
"(E) Performed dry needling treatment interventions without consulting an individual
licensed pursuant to Article 2 or 4 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 this title and without
complying with requirements provided for under Code Section 43-1-37."
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended in Code Section 43-34-62, relating to definitions relevant to
acupuncture, by revising paragraphs (1) and (4) as follows:
"(1) 'Acupuncture' means a modality practiced on the basis of traditional Chinese medical
principles and modern biomedical principles to stimulate underlying neural, muscular,
and connective tissues for preventive and therapeutic purposes a form of therapy
developed from traditional and modern Oriental concepts for health care that employs
Oriental medical techniques, treatment, and adjunctive therapies for the promotion,
maintenance, and restoration of health and the prevention of disease."
"(4) 'Practice of acupuncture' means the insertion of disposable acupuncture filiform
needles into the human body at either acupuncture points which have been clearly
mapped out over underlying bony landmarks and musculature or trigger points and the
application of moxibustion to specific areas of the human body based upon Oriental
medical principles as a therapeutic modality. Dry needling is a technique of the practice
of acupuncture. Adjunctive therapies within the scope of acupuncture may include
manual, mechanical, moxibustion, herbal, thermal, electrical, and electromagnetic
treatment and the recommendation of dietary guidelines and exercise, but only if such
treatments, recommendations, and exercises are based on concepts of traditional Oriental
Chinese medicine and are directly related to acupuncture therapy."
S. B. 169
- 3 -

LC 52 0748
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 169
- 4 -